database/seeds/suffix.aff
SFX a Y 1
SFX a 0 annya .
SFX b Y 1
SFX b 0 nya .
SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 anlah .
SFX e Y 1
SFX e 0 kanlah .
SFX f Y 1
SFX f 0 iku .
SFX g Y 1
SFX g 0 nyalah . 
SFX h Y 1
SFX h 0 an . 
SFX i Y 1
SFX i 0 mulah . 
SFX j Y 1
SFX j 0 ilah . 
SFX k Y 1
SFX k 0 kah . 
SFX l Y 1
SFX l 0 i .
SFX m Y 1
SFX m 0 inya .
SFX n Y 3
SFX n 0 kan [^k] 
SFX n k kan k 
SFX n an kan an 
SFX z Y 1
SFX z 0 kan k
SFX o Y 1
SFX o 0 imu .
SFX p Y 1
SFX p 0 lah . 
SFX q Y 1
SFX q 0 ku . 
SFX r Y 1
SFX r 0 mu . 
SFX s Y 1
SFX s 0 pun . 
SFX t Y 1
SFX t 0 ankah .
SFX u Y 1
SFX u 0 anku .
SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 anmu .
SFX w Y 1
SFX w 0 kukah .
SFX x Y 1
SFX x 0 kulah .
SFX y Y 1
SFX y 0 kannya .
SFX c Y 1
SFX c 0 isme .
